sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
abbentiare/G po:verbu
abbreviare/G po:verbu
acarrongiare/G po:verbu
acostiare/G po:verbu
addobiare/G po:verbu
afoghigiare/G po:verbu
afruschiare/G po:verbu
allampiare/G po:verbu
allogiare/G po:verbu
ammànnio/G po:verbu st:ammanniare 
annebidare/G po:verbu
apaghiare/G po:verbu
apenare/G po:verbu
apontziare/G po:verbu
argangiare/G po:verbu
arruingiare/G po:verbu
assachìgio/G po:verbu st:assachigiare 
assimigiare/G po:verbu
ateterare/G po:verbu
atzaculidare/G po:verbu
autoesiliare/G po:verbu
badulare/G po:verbu
bargaminare/G po:verbu
berbegargiare/G po:verbu
bischilliare/G po:verbu
bribilliare/G po:verbu
cabulare/G po:verbu
calunniare/G po:verbu
cancarare/G po:verbu
cantzigare/G po:verbu
carcherare/G po:verbu
cariare/G po:verbu
carrìgio/G po:verbu st:carrigiare 
castangiare/G po:verbu
chercugiare/G po:verbu
chimerigiare/G po:verbu
chiscugiare/G po:verbu
cojuare/G po:verbu
comerare/G po:verbu
conchinare/G po:verbu
contoniare/G po:verbu
contziliare/G po:verbu
cortegiare/G po:verbu
cracariare/G po:verbu
cramiare/G po:verbu
crentiare/G po:verbu
croculare/G po:verbu
cugugiare/G po:verbu
cunfanfarare/G po:verbu
curiare/G po:verbu
cussimingiare/G po:verbu
dare/H po:verbu
ddaddarare/G po:verbu
deificare/G po:verbu
depositare/G po:verbu
dilliriare/G po:verbu
disangrenare/G po:verbu
discomodare/G po:verbu
disgratziare/G po:verbu
dissambenare/G po:verbu
dòlimo/G po:verbu st:dolimare 
dumbulare/G po:verbu
erogare/G po:verbu
espropriare/G po:verbu
evocare/G po:verbu
fastidiare/G po:verbu
figiare/G po:verbu
forrigiare/G po:verbu
framiare/G po:verbu
frighìngio/G po:verbu st:frighingiare 
fumiare/G po:verbu
ghelestiare/G po:verbu
gironiare/G po:verbu
glorìfico/G po:verbu st:glorificare 
grujare/G po:verbu
illenare/G po:verbu
imbalsamare/G po:verbu
imbotilliare/G po:verbu
impischinare/G po:verbu
incarrargiare/G po:verbu
incungiare/G po:verbu
indormigare/G po:verbu
ingiovanare/G po:verbu
insidiare/G po:verbu
intrabulliare/G po:verbu
irradiare/G po:verbu
isbatigiare/G po:verbu
isbessare/G po:verbu
isbrasiare/G po:verbu
iscaldigiare/G po:verbu
iscangiare/G po:verbu
iscarchidare/G po:verbu
iscarrargiare/G po:verbu
ischichiare/G po:verbu
isciamiare/G po:verbu
iscoinare/G po:verbu
iscoragiare/G po:verbu
iscracalliare/G po:verbu
iscrufuliare/G po:verbu
iscuidare/G po:verbu
iscussorgiare/G po:verbu
isfarfarugiare/G po:verbu
isforrogare/G po:verbu
isgangiare/G po:verbu
islogiare/G po:verbu
ismussiare/G po:verbu
ispainare/G po:verbu
ispartzighinare/G po:verbu
ispeddiare/G po:verbu
ispertulare/G po:verbu
ispigiare/G po:verbu
ispitzulare/G po:verbu
isprabagiare/G po:verbu
ispuligare/G po:verbu
istagiare/G po:verbu
isterrinare/G po:verbu
istipulare/G po:verbu
istraddigare/G po:verbu
istremenare/G po:verbu
istrotogiare/G po:verbu
isturridare/G po:verbu
isvitziare/G po:verbu
lassìngio/G po:verbu st:lassingiare 
ledamìngio/G po:verbu st:ledamingiare 
leurare/G po:verbu
lisiare/G po:verbu
lughidare/G po:verbu
maculare/G po:verbu
mamughiare/G po:verbu
mantzulare/G po:verbu
masseritziare/G po:verbu
matzulare/G po:verbu
menguanare/G po:verbu
mesculare/G po:verbu
miriare/G po:verbu
mòlino/G po:verbu st:molinare 
mumughiare/G po:verbu
murrungiare/G po:verbu
nannigare/G po:verbu
netiare/G po:verbu
nolegiare/G po:verbu
numerare/G po:verbu
oliare/G po:verbu
organare/G po:verbu
orulare/G po:verbu
pampinare/G po:verbu
parigiare/G po:verbu
pasculare/G po:verbu
patzificare/G po:verbu
penetrare/G po:verbu
perliare/G po:verbu
pidantzulare/G po:verbu
pischiliare/G po:verbu
pisticulare/G po:verbu
pobulare/G po:verbu
porcargiare/G po:verbu
preigare/G po:verbu
prischiare/G po:verbu
prosperare/G po:verbu
puntilliare/G po:verbu
raspiare/G po:verbu
recapitare/G po:verbu
remugiare/G po:verbu
ricoverare/G po:verbu
rodeare/G po:verbu
runchinare/G po:verbu
saidare/G po:verbu
sapiare/G po:verbu
selliare/G po:verbu
significare/G po:verbu
sonigiare/G po:verbu
sorvelliare/G po:verbu
suliare/G po:verbu
suspiare/G po:verbu
tagiare/G po:verbu
tasigare/G po:verbu
tesserare/G po:verbu
tisigare/G po:verbu
totanare/G po:verbu
tralliare/G po:verbu
trastigiare/G po:verbu
triulare/G po:verbu
tunicare/G po:verbu
tzatzarrare/G po:verbu
tzirigare/G po:verbu
tzurrigare/G po:verbu
vendicare/G po:verbu
